Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-8917
License; denied; disciplinary actions; grounds; department; duties.

(1) A veterinary drug distributor license may be denied, refused renewal, suspended, limited, or revoked by the Director of Public Health if he or she finds that the applicant or licensee; the designated representative; the owner if a sole proprietorship; or any person having an interest in the applicant or licensee of more than ten percent has been found to have committed any of the following acts or offenses:

(a) Violation of the Veterinary Drug Distribution Licensing Act or the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated under the act;

(b) Conviction of a misdemeanor or felony under state law, federal law, or the law of another jurisdiction which, if committed within this state, would have constituted a misdemeanor or felony under state law and which has a rational connection with the person's capacity to distribute veterinary legend drugs;

(c) Unprofessional conduct under the Uniform Credentialing Act;

(d) Active addiction as defined in section 38-106;

(e) Permitting, aiding, or abetting veterinary drug distribution or the performance of activities requiring a license under the Veterinary Drug Distribution Licensing Act by a person not licensed under the Veterinary Drug Distribution Licensing Act;

(f) Having had his or her credential denied, refused renewal, limited, suspended, or revoked or having had such credential disciplined in any other manner by another jurisdiction relating to the performance of veterinary drug distribution;

(g) Performing veterinary drug distribution without a valid license or in contravention of any limitation placed upon the license; or

(h) Fraud, forgery, or misrepresentation of material facts in procuring or attempting to procure a license under the Veterinary Drug Distribution Licensing Act.

(2) The department shall issue or renew a license to any applicant that satisfies the requirements for licensure or license renewal under the Veterinary Drug Distribution Licensing Act.

Laws 2008, LB1022, § 17.

Uniform Credentialing Act, see section 38-101.